Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 19 Fertilizers, Liming Materials, and Soil Amendment
2-19-410. Inspection fee and sales reports.

(1)The registrant shall pay to the State Plant Board an inspection fee of thirty-seven and one-half cents (37.5¢) per ton on all products registered and sold in this state.

Each registrant shall keep adequate records of sales and shall file with the board, on a monthly basis, a signed report of the tonnage distributed by county during the preceding month.

The report and payment of the inspection fee shall be due on or before the twentieth day of the month.

(1)If the report is not filed, or the report is false in any respect or the inspection fee is not paid within the thirty-day period, the board may revoke the registration.

A penalty of one dollar ($1.00) per day is assessed for each day the payment is overdue until paid.

The inspection fee and the penalty shall constitute a debt and become the basis for a judgment against the registrant which may be collected by the board in any court of competent jurisdiction without prior demand.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2106.

2-19-411. Prohibited acts.

It shall be a violation of this subchapter for any person to:

Distribute a soil amendment that is not registered with the State Plant Board;

Distribute a soil amendment that is not labeled;

Distribute a soil amendment that is misbranded;

Distribute a soil amendment that is adulterated;

Fail to comply with a stop-sale, use, or removal order; or

Fail to pay the inspection fee.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2108.

2-19-412. Stop-sale, use, or removal orders.

The State Plant Board may issue and enforce a written or printed stop-sale, use, or removal order to the owner or custodian of any lot of soil amendment to hold the lot at a designated place when the board finds the soil amendment being offered or exposed for sale is not registered, is not labeled, is misbranded, or is adulterated, until such time as the product or labeling complies with this subchapter.

The soil amendment may then be released in writing by the board.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 3: July 25, 1988. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the use of 100 percent natural organic fertilizer will make substantial contributions to the agricultural industry in the State, and enable the State Plant Board to collect additional fees to provide for the efficient and necessary operation of the State Plant Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2107.

2-19-413. Injunctions.

The State Plant Board is authorized to apply for, and the court is authorized to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this subchapter or any rule promulgated under it, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

The injunction shall be issued without bond.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2112; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 18.

2-19-414. Deposit of moneys.

The State Plant Board shall remit all moneys received by or for it under this subchapter to the Treasurer of State.

Upon receipt of any remittance, the Treasurer of State shall deposit the entire amount into the State Treasury and handle the funds in the same manner as required in §2-19-209.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2113.

Subchapter 5

— Natural Organic Fertilizers

2-19-501. Definition.

“One hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizer” shall be defined as and include the following:

One hundred percent (100%) organic fertilizer — Materials derived from either plant or animal products containing one (1) or more elements other than carbon, hydrogen, and oxygen which are essential for plant growth.

These materials may be subjected to biological degradation processes under conditions of drying, composting, enzymatic or anaerobic/aerobic bacterial action or any combination of these.

These materials shall not be mixed with synthetic materials;

One hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizer shall be processed from only one hundred percent (100%) animal substrate. No other organic or inorganic, natural or synthetic, additives shall be used during processing and no fortification may be used;

One hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizers shall contain as a guaranteed analysis not less than: nitrogen (N), four percent (4.0%); phosphoric acid (P2O5), two percent (2.0%); and potash (K2O), four percent (4.0%); and

Determination of the guaranteed analysis will be according to methods adopted by the AOAC International. (Fertilizers and Materials Containing Large Quantities of Organic Matter; 12th edition, With Following Improvements.).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment redesignated the introductory language of (1) as (1)(A), and redesignated former (1)(A) and (1)(B) as (1)(B) and (1)(C).

History.

Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 1; 1991, No. 968, § 1; 2019, No. 378, § 4.

2-19-502. Regulation and supervision — Fees and penalties — Guarantee of elements.

The State Plant Board shall have the authority to regulate and supervise the manufacture and sale of one hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizer, including the setting and collecting of reasonable fees for sampling and analyzing the fertilizer and registering manufacturers, and shall adopt and promulgate such rules and penalties consistent with this subchapter, and § 2-19-202, as may be necessary.

The fees and penalties set and collected by the board under this section shall not exceed like fees and penalties set for other types of fertilizers.

When any reference or claim is made on the label for secondary or minor plant nutrients, a specific guarantee of the specific elements contained shall be given in the guaranteed analysis.

History.

Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 1; 1989, No. 42, § 1; 1991, No. 968, § 2.

2-19-503. Exemptions.

This subchapter shall not affect the private sale of unprocessed animal litter, nor shall the State Plant Board regulate the private sale of unprocessed animal litter which is not sold as one hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizer as defined by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 1; 1991, No. 968, § 3.

Subchapter 2

— Fertilizers